Washington statutes.
RCW 19.94.507

Gasoline delivered to service stations—Invoice required.

Persons delivering gasoline to retail service stations shall supply the station with an invoice which shall include the following information: (1) The gross volume of gasoline and the net volume of gasoline at sixty degrees Fahrenheit; (2) the time and temperature of the gasoline as loaded onto the delivery truck; and (3) the time of delivery to the retail service station.

[ 1987 c 42 s 2.]

NOTES:

Intent—1987 c 42: "The legislature finds: That leaking underground storage tanks containing petroleum products may pose a significant and widespread problem to human health and the environment, that current inventory procedures are inadequately suited to identify leaking underground storage tanks, and that new measures are needed to properly determine which tanks may be leaking." [ 1987 c 42 s 1.]